California, session 20252026, AB2006.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 4564 is added to the Government Code, immediately following Section 4563, to read:4564. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) There is a substantial need to provide quality childcare facilities for state employees and the communities surrounding state-owned buildings.(2) Many California families struggle to find the quality and affordable care they need.(3) State-owned buildings provide a significant opportunity to provide new space for licensed childcare providers in locations that are in proximity to where Californians work and live.(b) On and after January 1, 2027, when the state constructs, acquires, or receives as a gift any office building that can accommodate state employees, or when additions, alterations, or repairs are made to any existing state-owned office building, and the additions, alterations, or repairs both change and affect the use of 25 percent of the net square foot area of the building and include addition to, alteration of, or repair of the first floor, priority shall be given to licensed childcare providers that seek to contract with the Director of General Services to use a part of the space as a daycare center.(c) (1) Use of a space described in subdivision (b) by a licensed childcare provider as a daycare center shall be subject to terms and conditions set forth by the Director of General Services, including the cost set by the director under paragraph (2).(2) The space shall be made available at a rate to be established by the Director of General Services based upon the actual cost to the state, the average cost of state-owned space in the area, or the statewide average cost of state-owned space, whichever is less. However, if the director determines that a lower rent must be charged to ensure the viability of a daycare center, the director may charge a lower rate.(d) (1) Space designed within a state-owned office building for the daycare center shall comply with the prevailing local and state safety building codes for daycare centers.(2) The indoor activity space and outdoor activity space shall comply with the requirements in Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.(e) The Director of General Services may also secure space, that is not subject to subdivision (b) and that is not attached to a state-owned office building, for use as a daycare center run by a licensed childcare provider if funds are made available for those purposes and the director determines that any of the following conditions exist:(1) All other physical requirements controlling the development of the daycare center within the state-owned office building cannot be utilized.(2) It is more cost-efficient for the state to provide for equivalent daycare centers within a reasonable distance of the state-owned office building.(3) Locating the daycare center within a reasonable distance from the state-owned office building would provide an enhanced facility for the children or would mitigate security concerns.(f) Existing state-owned office buildings may also be retrofitted to accommodate a daycare center at the discretion of the Director of General Services, to the extent that state funds are made available for these purposes.(g) Priority for enrollment of children in daycare centers established pursuant to this section shall be in the following order:(1) State employees who work in the state-owned office building.(2) All other state employees.(3) Members of the community with a primary residence within a five mile five-mile radius of the state office building.(h) This section shall not apply to any office buildings used or owned by the state that provide care or 24-hour residential care for patients, inmates, or wards of the state, such as state hospitals and correctional facilities.(i) This section shall not apply to facilities owned, operated, or occupied by the California Highway Patrol. (i)(j) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:(1)  “Daycare center” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 1596.76 of the Health and Safety Code.(2) “Licensed childcare provider” means a person who operates a daycare center and is licensed pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 1596.90) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code. Code or a person who plans to apply for a childcare license.